Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3524
Care and services;
costs and fees; authority of board to compromise.

The
governing board of any hospital
providing the care and services described in section 23-3522 and its administrator
or his or her designee may compromise and settle or completely
write off the costs and fees for care and services rendered in or by the hospital pursuant
to any terms and conditions of policies approved by the board.

Laws 1971, LB 908, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.72;

Laws 2012, LB995, § 10.